New York, session 2025-2026, A6081.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The veterans' services law is amended by adding a new 2 section 29-c to read as follows: 3 § 29-c. Veteran-owned business directory. 1. As used in this section 4 the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Business owned and controlled by veterans" means a business (i) 6 not less than fifty-one percent of which is owned by one or more veter- 7 ans, or, in the case of any publicly owned business, not less than 8 fifty-one percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more veter- 9 ans; (ii) the management and daily business operations of which are 10 controlled by one or more veterans; and (iii) authorized to do business 11 in the state and which is independently owned and operated. 12 (b) "Veteran" means a person, as defined in section one of this arti- 13 cle, who served on active duty and has been discharged or released ther- 14 efrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or has a qualifying 15 condition as defined in section one of this article and has received a 16 discharge other than bad conduct or dishonorable, or is a discharged 17 LGBT veteran as defined in section one of this article and has received 18 a discharge other than bad conduct or dishonorable; 19 (c) "Service-disabled veteran" shall have the same meaning as defined 20 in section forty of this chapter; 21 (d) "Certified service-disabled veteran-owned business enterprise" 22 shall have the same meaning as defined in section forty of this chapter; 23 and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09081-01-5 A. 6081 2 1 (e) "Veteran-owned business enterprises" shall mean businesses owned 2 and controlled by veterans, and service-disabled veteran-owned business 3 enterprises. 4 2. The department, with the aid and assistance of the division of 5 small business, the department of labor, the division of service-disa- 6 bled veterans' business development, and the office of general services, 7 shall develop, regularly update, and make available to state agencies 8 and the public a directory of veteran-owned business enterprises which 9 shall, wherever practicable, be divided into categories of labor, 10 services, supplies, equipment, materials and recognized construction 11 trades and which shall indicate areas or locations of the state where 12 such enterprises are available to perform services. Such directory 13 shall use an asterisk or other special mark to denote any veteran-owned 14 business enterprises which are service-disabled veteran-owned business 15 enterprises. Such directory shall be posted on the department's 16 website. 17 3. The office of general services shall also use this information to 18 create and regularly update an internet based, searchable centralized 19 state database to promote veteran-owned business enterprises to the 20 public and shall post such database on the office of general services' 21 website. 22 4. The department with the office of general services shall conduct 23 outreach to notify veteran-owned business enterprises of such directory 24 and database. 25 5. The department shall develop a registration process with the office 26 of general services for veteran-owned business enterprises to complete 27 in order to compile information for inclusion in the directory and data- 28 base. The department shall be responsible for verifying businesses as 29 being a business owned and controlled by veterans as defined in this 30 section including the development of rules and regulations governing the 31 approval, denial, or revocation of a business's status as a business 32 owned and controlled by veterans. 33 § 2. Subdivision 7 of section 4 of the veterans' services law is 34 amended to read as follows: 35 7. To provide in cooperation with the office of general services and 36 the office of the comptroller a series of seminars, that shall be 37 conducted four or more times per year at regional sites located through- 38 out the state of New York for the purpose of advising veteran-owned 39 businesses regarding the opportunities available for obtaining procure- 40 ment contracts from New York state agencies, municipalities, and author- 41 ities. [Furthermore the] The seminars shall provide requirements and 42 training that will enable veteran-owned businesses to successfully 43 participate in the procurement process. Furthermore, the seminars shall 44 provide registration information regarding the veteran-owned business 45 directory and database pursuant to section twenty-nine-c of this arti- 46 cle. 47 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 48 the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 49 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 50 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 51 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.